Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1725
Parking Authority Law; supplementary to existing law; severability.

The Parking Authority Law shall be independent of and in addition to any other provisions of law of the State of Nebraska with reference to the matters covered by such law and shall be considered as a complete and independent act and not as amendatory of or limited by any other provisions of law of the State of Nebraska. If any provision of the Parking Authority Law is held unconstitutional or invalid, it shall not affect the other provisions of such law.

Laws 1955, c. 22, § 25, p. 113;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 308.